Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1804
Authority, defined.

Authority means the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority created by the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act or any board, body, commission, department, or office succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers conferred upon such authority by the act are given by law.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 4.